Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2209
Payments to municipality; municipal treasurer; receipt.

The treasurer of every city or village shall make duplicate receipts for all sums which shall be paid into his office, which receipts shall show the source from which such funds are derived, and shall, by distinct lines and columns, show the amount received to the credit of each separate fund, and whether the same was paid in cash, in warrants, or otherwise; one of which duplicates the treasurer shall deliver to the person making such payment, and the other he shall retain in his office.

Laws 1871, § 7, p. 115;

R.S.1913, § 6648;

C.S.1922, § 6179;

C.S.1929, § 77-2407;

R.S.1943, § 77-2209.